Washington statutes.
RCW 35.16.060

Effect of exclusion as to liability for indebtedness.

The exclusion of an area from the boundaries of a city or town shall not exempt any real property therein from taxation for the purpose of paying any indebtedness of the city or town existing at the time of its exclusion, and the interest thereon.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.16.060. Prior: 1895 c 93 s 4, part; RRS s 8905, part.]